Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
3D]

RISK MANAGEMENT
AND OWN RISK AND SOLVENCY ASSESSMENT

[§431:3D-101] Scope and purpose. (a) This
article shall apply to all insurers domiciled in this State unless exempt pursuant
to section 431:3D-106.

(b) The purposes of this article shall be to:

(1) Provide the requirements for maintaining a risk management
framework and completing an own risk and solvency assessment; and

(2) Provide guidance and instructions for filing an
own risk and solvency assessment summary report with the commissioner. [L 2016,
c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next